test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-luqm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - luʼm: # Noun 81 'eng /est lumi/fin' - full paradigm
     luʼm+N+Sg+Nom: [luʼm, lum]
     luʼm+N+Sg+Gen: [luʼm, lum]
     luʼm+N+Sg+Par: lūnda
     luʼm+N+Sg+Dat: [luʼmmõn, lummõn]
     luʼm+N+Sg+Ins: [luʼmkõks, lumkõks]
     luʼm+N+Sg+Ill: [luʼmmõ, lummõ]
     luʼm+N+Sg+Ela: [luʼmstõ, lumstõ]
     luʼm+N+Pl+Nom: lumūd
     luʼm+N+Pl+Gen: lumūd
     luʼm+N+Pl+Par: lumīdi
     luʼm+N+Pl+Dat: lumūdõn
     luʼm+N+Pl+Ins: lumūdõks
     luʼm+N+Pl+Ill: lumīž
     luʼm+N+Pl+Ela: [luʼmšti, lumšti]
